apertium-sme-nob.sme.lexc
LEXICON BERN-UCASE-LOAN
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+CmpN/SgN: RHyph ;
+CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub: Rreal ; ! Sub without hyph
+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%:s K ; ! Ty^dal:s
+Use/Sub: BERN-OBL ; !
+Use/Sub:%: BERN-OBL ; !
+Use/Sub:%- BERN-OBL ; !
+Use/Sub:%: LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !
+Use/Sub:%- LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !
+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub: K ;
+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:a K ;
+CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:a RHyph ; ! Gen is sub
+CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:a Rreal ; ! Gen and no hyph is sub
+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:a K ;
+Sg+Acc+Use/NG+Use/Sub: K ;
+Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:i K ;
+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:as K ;
+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:an K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com+Use/Sub:ain K ;
+Ess+Use/Sub:an K ;
+Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:at K ;
+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:ajd9 K ;
+Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:ajd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:ajde K ;
+Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:ain K ;
+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:aigujn K ;


LEXICON BERN-OBL
+Sg+Gen+Use/NG: K ;
+Sg+Gen:a K ;
+CmpN/SgG:a RHyph ;
+CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:a Rreal ; ! No hyph is sub
+Sg+Acc:a K ;
+Sg+Acc+Use/NG: K ;
+Sg+Ill:ij K ;
+Sg+Loc:as K ;
+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:an K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:ain K ;
+Ess:an K ;
+Pl+Nom:at K ;
+Pl+Gen:ajd9 K ;
+Pl+Acc:ajd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill:ajde K ;
+Pl+Loc:ain K ;
+Pl+Com:aigujn K ;

!The BERN plural forms are different from CNAME because there is
!a form Peraid from Per in coprus.

LEXICON HEIM-sur   !only for -heim:-heimas/-heim:-heimmas
+N+Prop+Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
+N+Prop+Sur:%> HEIMDECL ;
@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON HEIM-LOAN-plc !only for -heim:-heimas/-heim:-heimmas
+N+Prop+Plc:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%> HEIMDECL ; !
+Use/Sub:%>a PLACELASH ;

LEXICON HEIM-plc !only for -heim:-heimas/-heim:-heimmas
+N+Prop+Plc:%> BERNDECL ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%> HEIMDECL ; !
:%>a PLACELASH ;


LEXICON HEIMDECL
HEIM-DC ;
@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@i ACCRA-I ;
@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ma ACCRA-OBL ;
@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ MARJA-SHORTGEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ma ACCRA-IICASE ;

LEXICON HEIM-DC
@U.Cap.Obl@ HEIM-NE ;

LEXICON HEIM-NE
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+CmpN/SgN: RHyph ;
+CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub: Rreal ; ! No hyph is sub
+Ess:an K ;

LEXICON SUND-sur !only for -sund:-sundas/-sund:-sunddas
+N+Prop+Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
+N+Prop+Sur:%> SUNDDECL ;
@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON SUND-LOAN-plc !only for -sund:-sundas/-sund:-sunddas
+N+Prop+Plc:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%> SUNDDECL ; !
@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ DenominalAdjsC2 ; !
@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ DenominalAdjsC3 ;    !

LEXICON SUND-plc !only for -sund:-sundas/-sund:-sunddas
+N+Prop+Plc:%> BERNDECL ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%> SUNDDECL ; !
@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;
@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ DenominalAdjsC3 ;    !


LEXICON SUNDDECL
HEIM-DC ;
@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@i ACCRA-I ;
@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@da ACCRA-OBL ;
@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ MARJA-SHORTGEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@da ACCRA-IICASE ;



! From MALIS
LEXICON DUORTNUS-ani
+N+Prop+Ani:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-mal
+N+Prop+Mal:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-obj
+N+Prop+Obj:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-org
+N+Prop+Org:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-plc
+N+Prop+Plc:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;
+N+Prop+Plc:%>X4 DenominalAdjsC2 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%>X4 DenominalAdjsC3 ; !


LEXICON DUORTNUSDECL ! Cns-final, cons.grad.
@U.Cap.Obl@ DUORTNUS-OBL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-OBL
+Sg+Nom:X4 K ;
+CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X7 RHyph ; !
+CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8 RHyph ; !
+CmpN/SgN:X4 RHyph ;
+CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X7 Rreal ; !
+CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8 Rreal ; !
+CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X4 Rreal ; !
+Ess:X4in K ;
+Sg+Gen:X2a K ;
+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:X2 K ; !
+CmpN/SgG+Use/NG:X2 RHyph ;
+CmpN/SgG:X2a RHyph ;
+CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:X2 Rreal ; !
+CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:X2a Rreal ; !
+Sg+Acc:X2a K ;
+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:X2 K ; !
+Sg+Ill:X2ij K ;
+Sg+Loc:X2is K ;
+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:X2in K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:X2ijn K ;
+Pl+Nom:X2at K ;
+Pl+Gen:X2ijd K ;
+Pl+Acc:X2ijd K ;
+Pl+Ill:X2ijdda K ;
+Pl+Loc:X2ijn K ;
+Pl+Com:X2ijguin K ;


LEXICON RANES-plc !Ráneš:Rátnáhii
@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ RANES-OBL ;
+N+Prop+Plc:ne%>X4š DenominalAdjsC2 ;


LEXICON RANES-OBL
+Sg+Nom:neX4š K ;
+CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:neX7š RHyph ; !
+CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:neX8š RHyph ; !
+CmpN/SgN:neX4š RHyph ;
+Ess:neX4šin K ;
+Sg+Gen:tnáX2ha K ;
+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:tnáX2t K ; !
+CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:tnáX2t RHyph ; !
+CmpN/SgG:tnáX2ha RHyph ;
+Sg+Acc:tnáX2ha K ;
+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:tnáX2t K ; !
+Sg+Ill:tnáX2hij K ;
+Sg+Loc:tnáX2his K ;
+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:tnáX2hin K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:tnáX2hijn K ;
+Pl+Nom:tnáX2hat K ;
+Pl+Gen:tnáX2hijd K ;
+Pl+Acc:tnáX2hijd K ;
+Pl+Ill:tnáX2hijdda K ;
+Pl+Loc:tnáX2hijn K ;
+Pl+Com:tnáX2hijguin K ;

LEXICON CAVKKUS-plc !Čávkkus:Čávkohii
@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ CAVKKUS-OBL ;
+N+Prop+Plc:%>us DenominalAdjsC2 ;


LEXICON CAVKKUS-OBL
+Sg+Nom:kus K ;
+CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:kos RHyph ; !
+CmpN/SgN:kus RHyph ; 
+Ess:kusin K ;
+Sg+Gen:oha K ;
+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:ot K ; !
+CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:ot RHyph ; !
+CmpN/SgG:oha RHyph ;
+Sg+Acc:oha K ;
+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:ot K ; !
+Sg+Ill:ohij K ;
+Sg+Loc:ohis K ;
+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:ohin K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:ohijn K ;
+Pl+Nom:ohat K ;
+Pl+Gen:ohijd K ;
+Pl+Acc:ohijd K ;
+Pl+Ill:ohijdda K ;
+Pl+Loc:ohijn K ;
+Pl+Com:ohijguin K ;

LEXICON GATA-plc
+N+Prop+Plc:gata ACCRADECL ;
+N+Prop+Plc:gaten LONDONDECL ;
+N+Prop+Plc:gt # ;

LEXICON ANAR-ani
+N+Prop+Ani:%> ANARDECL ;
+N+Prop+Ani+Der/Dimin:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ažž PLACE-DIMV ;

LEXICON ANAR-obj
+N+Prop+Obj:%> ANARDECL ;

LEXICON ANAR-org
+N+Prop+Org:%> ANARDECL ;

LEXICON ANAR-mal
+N+Prop+Mal:%> ANARDECL ;
+N+Prop+Mal+Der/Dimin:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ažž PLACE-DIMV ;

LEXICON ANAR-fem
+N+Prop+Fem:%>  ANARDECL ;
+N+Prop+Fem+Der/Dimin:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ažž PLACE-DIMV ;

LEXICON ANAR-sur
+N+Prop+Sur:%> ANARDECL ;

LEXICON ANAR-plc ! Place names
+N+Prop+Plc:%> ANARDECL ;
+N+Prop+Plc:%> DenominalAdjsC2 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%> DenominalAdjsC3 ; !

LEXICON ANAR
+N+Prop:%> ANARDECL ;

LEXICON ANARDECL ! Cns-fin, no cons.grad.
@U.Cap.Obl@ ANAR-OBL ;


LEXICON ANAR-OBL
+Attr+Use/Sub: K ;  !
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X7 RHyph ;
+CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X7 Rreal ; ! Sub without hyph
+CmpN/SgN: RHyph ;
+Ess:in K ;
+Sg+Gen:a K ;
+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub: K ; !
+CmpN/SgG+Use/NG:X2 RHyph ;
+CmpN/SgG:X2a RHyph ;
+CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:X2 Rreal ; ! Sub without hyph
+CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:X2a Rreal ; ! Sub without hyph
+Sg+Acc:a K ;
+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub: K ; !
+Sg+Ill:ij K ;
+Sg+Loc:is K ;
+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:in K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:ijn K ;
+Pl+Nom:at K ;
+Pl+Gen:ijd K ;
+Pl+Acc:ijd K ;
+Pl+Ill:ijdda K ;
+Pl+Loc:ijn K ;
+Pl+Com:ijguin K ;


LEXICON HEANDARAT-obj
+N+Prop+Obj:%> HEANDARATDECL ;

LEXICON HEANDARAT-org
+N+Prop+Org:%> HEANDARATDECL ;

LEXICON HEANDARAT-mal
+N+Prop+Mal:%>  HEANDARATDECL ;
+N+Prop+Mal+Der/Dimin:%>aX6ž PLACE-DIMDECL ;

LEXICON HEANDARAT-fem
+N+Prop+Fem:%>  HEANDARATDECL ;
+N+Prop+Fem+Der/Dimin:%>aX6ž PLACE-DIMDECL ;

LEXICON HEANDARAT-plc ! Place names
+N+Prop+Plc:%>  HEANDARATDECL ;
+N+Prop+Plc:%> DenominalAdjsC2 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%> DenominalAdjsC3 ; !
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:aX4 VUONAT ;

LEXICON HEANDARATDECL ! Bisyll. Non-Gradating C-Proper Names
@U.Cap.Obl@ HEANDARAT-OBL ;


LEXICON HEANDARAT-OBL
+Attr+Use/Sub: K ;  !
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+CmpN/SgN: RHyph ;
+CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub: Rreal ; ! Sub without hyph
+Sg+Gen:aX4 K ;
+Sg+Acc:aX4 K ;
+Sg+Ill:aX3j K ;
+Sg+Loc:aX4s K ;
+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:aX4n K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:aX5jn K ;
+Pl+Nom:aX4t K ;
+Pl+Gen:aX5jd K ;
+Pl+Acc:aX5jd K ;
+Pl+Ill:aX5jde K ;
+Pl+Loc:aX5jn K ;
+Pl+Com:aX5jgujn K ;
+Ess:an K ;

LEXICON GEAVNNIS-ani
+N+Prop+Ani:%> GEAVNNISDECL ;

LEXICON GEAVNNIS-mal
+N+Prop+Mal:%>  GEAVNNISDECL ;

LEXICON GEAVNNIS-plc ! Place names
+N+Prop+Plc:%> GEAVNNISDECL ;
+N+Prop+Plc:%>Y5 DenominalAdjsC2 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%>Y5 DenominalAdjsC3 ; !

LEXICON GEAVNNISDECL
@U.Cap.Obl@ GEAVNNIS-OBL ;

LEXICON ProperNoun
Ammun ANAR ;
Anárjohgeavŋŋis:Anár^joh^geavgŋis GEAVNNIS-plc ;
Badjegeavŋŋis:Badje^geavgŋis GEAVNNIS-plc ;
Bargiid#bellodat:Bargiid9#bellodah'k HEANDARAT-org ;
Beaskáđđas+Use/Sub:Beaskáđđas ANAR-plc ; !
Biebmosihkkarvuođalágádus:Biebmo^sihkkarvuođa^lágáduss HEANDARAT-org ;
Birehaš:Birehažž HEANDARAT-fem ;
Bálat+Use/Sub:Bálag ANAR-plc ; !
Bárttet:Bártteh ANAR ; ! Final t:h gradation
Bárttán:Bárttán9 DUORTNUS-mal ;
Duoddaras:Duoddarass HEANDARAT-plc ;
Duomis:Duommis GEAVNNIS-mal ;
Duomás:Duopmás DUORTNUS-mal ;
Duortnos+Use/Sub:Duortnos DUORTNUS-plc ; !
Gaskanjáskkahat:Gaska^njáskkahah'k HEANDARAT-plc ;
Gaza-sárggis:Gaza-sár'gis GEAVNNIS-plc ;
Geavugeavŋŋis:Geavu^geavgŋis GEAVNNIS-plc ;
Guovddášbellodat:Guovddáš^bellodah'k HEANDARAT-org ;
Guovssahas:Guovssahass HEANDARAT-obj ;
Gálggoluoppal:Gálggo^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Gávvir ANAR-plc ;
Hattiraš+Use/Sub:Hattiražž HEANDARAT-plc ; !
Heandarat:Heandarah'k HEANDARAT-mal ;
INTRO-álbmot:INTRO-álbmog ANAR-org ;
Jiehkkášaš:Jiehkkášažž HEANDARAT-plc ;
Jievdeš:Jievdež ANAR-org ;
Johannasurttas:Johannasur'tas DUORTNUS-obj ;
Jovssut:Jovssub ANAR-mal ;
Jussenaš:Jussenažž HEANDARAT-mal ; ! MARJA 
Justiisaministtar:Justiisa^minis'tar DUORTNUS-mal ;
Kreditordieđáhus:Kreditor^dieđáhuss HEANDARAT-org ;
Láhpoluoppal:Láhpo^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Láhtin:Láhtin9 ANAR-plc ;
Lávrrohaš:Lávrrohažž HEANDARAT-mal ;
Mihkalmas:Mihkalmass HEANDARAT-obj ;
Mihkkelaš:Mihkkelažž HEANDARAT-mal ;
Máhttegeavŋŋis:Máhtte^geavgŋis GEAVNNIS-plc ;
Nanaš:Nannaš DUORTNUS-obj ;
Njárgon:Njárgon9 ANAR-ani ;
Nálganaš:Nálganažž HEANDARAT-plc ;
Oddsspeallan:Odds^speallam ANAR-obj ;
Ofelaš:Ofelažž HEANDARAT-obj ;
Olgeš:Olgež ANAR-org ;
Ommot:Ommod ANAR-mal ;
Ovddádus#bellodat:Ovddádus#bellodah'k HEANDARAT-org ;
Rihtáluoppal:Rihtá^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Ruossut-Rássut:Ruossut-Rássuh ANAR-obj ;
Ráissot:Ráissoh ANAR-ani ;
Ráneš:Rá RANES-plc ;
S-Muzet:S-Muzeh ANAR-ani ;
S-Ruškut:S-Ruškuh ANAR-ani ;
Sieidebálggis:Sieide^bál'gis GEAVNNIS-plc ;
Skiehččan:Skiehččam ANAR-plc ; !FIN
Suolojárluoppal:Suolo^jár^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Ságat:Ságah ANAR-org ;
Sápmelaš:Sápmelažž HEANDARAT-obj ;
Voksenåsen-julggaštus:Voksenåsen-julggaštuss HEANDARAT-obj ;
Vuojaš:Vuojaž ANAR-sur ;
Vuolát:Vuoláb ANAR-sur ;
Váljoht`% Biras:Vál^joht`% Birras DUORTNUS-org ;
Väkkäraš:Väkkäražž HEANDARAT-mal ;
Ádjagas:Ádjagass HEANDARAT-org ;
Áhkkanas:Áhkkanass HEANDARAT-plc ;
Áiligas+Use/Sub:Áiligas ANAR-plc ; !
Áilluhaš+Use/Sub:Áilluhažž HEANDARAT-mal ; !
Ánddar:Án'dar DUORTNUS-mal ;
Árran ANAR-obj ;
Ávjášluoppal:Ávjáš^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Ávvir ANAR-org ;
Åstot:Åstoh ANAR-sur ;
Čáhppes% Bearral ANAR-obj ;
Čávkkus:Čávk CAVKKUS-plc ;
Asheim:As^heim9 HEIM-plc ;
Aslat:Aslah ANAR-mal ;
Biret:Bireh ANAR-fem ;
Birgget:Birg'eh ANAR-fem ;
Bjørkheim:Bjørk^heim9 HEIM-plc ;
Bliksund:Blik^sund9 SUND-plc ;
Divvun:Divvum ANAR-obj ;
Egernsund:Egern^sund9 SUND-plc ;
Eidheim:Eid^heim9 HEIM-sur ;
Fjellgata:Fjell^ GATA-plc ;
Furuheim:Furu^heim9 HEIM-plc ;
Guhtor ANAR-sur ;
Guhtur ANAR-mal ;
Gutnel ANAR-fem ;
Hadsund:Hadsund9 SUND-sur ;
Havøysund:Hav^øy^sund9 SUND-plc ;
Helheim:Hel^heim9 HEIM-sur ;
Kildegata:Kilde^ GATA-plc ;
Kjærsund:Kjær^sund9 SUND-sur ;
Kvalsund:Kval^sund9 SUND-plc ;
Luhkkar ANAR-sur ;
Malmheim:Malm^heim9 HEIM-sur ;
Meckenheim:Mecken^heim9 HEIM-plc ;
Mellet:Mel^leh ANAR-mal ;
Midsund:Mid^sund9 SUND-sur ;
Myrgata:Myr^ GATA-plc ;
Máret:Máreh ANAR-fem ;
Márgget:Márggeh ANAR-fem ;
Nilut:Niluh ANAR-sur ;
Nivlheim:Nivl^heim9 HEIM-sur ;
Norheimsund:Nor^heim^sund9 SUND-plc ;
Nålsund:Nål^sund9 SUND-sur ;
Oddesund:Odde^sund9 SUND-sur ;
Poastal ANAR-obj ;
Ranheim:Ran^heim9 HEIM-sur ;
Sjøgata:Sjø^ GATA-plc ;
Skippergata:Skipper^ GATA-plc ;
Sporsheim:Spors^heim9 HEIM-plc ;
Stongasund:Stonga^sund9 SUND-sur ;
Storgata:Stor^ GATA-plc ;
Storsund:Stor^sund9 SUND-plc ;
Sáhppángillar+Use/Sub:Sáhppán^gillar ANAR-org ; ! !Sáhppángillár gánddat
Sørheim:Sør^heim9 HEIM-sur ;
Tjeldsund:Tjeld^sund9 SUND-LOAN-plc ;
Tjøstheim:Tjøst^heim9 HEIM-plc ;
Tromsøysund:Troms^øy^sund9 SUND-LOAN-plc ;
Trondheim:Trond^heim9 HEIM-LOAN-plc ;
Álet:Áleh ANAR-fem ;
Áslat:Áslah ANAR-mal ;
Östersund:Öster^sund9 SUND-LOAN-plc ;
